FOMA_Scripts/fullgerman.foma
read lexc vol.lexc
define Voc;

read lexc fullgerman.lexc
define Lexicon;


define UPCase [A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z|Ä|Ö|Ü] ;
define LOWCase [a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|ä|ü|ö|β] ;
define C [b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|P|Q|R|S|T|V|W|X|Y|Z|β|ä|ö|ü|Ä|Ö|Ü] ;
define NOU [A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z|a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z|ä|ü|ö|Ä|Ö|Ü|β];
define RC [0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z|Ä|Ö|Ü|a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|ä|ü|ö|β];

define RuleSymbolPM ["-a"|"-is"|"-us"|"-on"|"-s"|"-um"];

define Dela a -> 0 || ?* _ "-a" "+um"* "^" ?* ;
define Delis {is} -> 0 || ?* _ "-is" "+um"* "^" ?* ;
define Delus {us} -> 0 || ?* _ "-us" "+um"* "^" ?* ;
define Delon {on} -> 0 || ?* _ "-on" "+um"* "^" ?* ;
define Dels s -> 0 || ?* _ "-s" "+um"* "^" ?* ;
define Delum {um} -> 0 || ?* _ "-um" "+um"* "^" ?* ;
define Addpref   .?* "^" "+ge" ?*. @-> {ge} ...;

define DelAdd Dela  .o.
              Delis  .o.
              Delus  .o.
              Dels   .o.
              Delum   .o.
              Addpref  ;


define Plusum3 u -> "+umu" || NOU* _ RC*  RuleSymbolPM* "+um" "^" ?* ;
define Plusum1 a -> "+uma" || C* _ RC*  RuleSymbolPM* "+um" "^" ?* ;
define Plusum2 o -> "+umo" || C* _ RC*  RuleSymbolPM* "+um" "^" ?* ;

define Plusumfr "+umu" -> ü, "+uma" -> ä, "+umo" -> ö;

define Plusumx Plusum3  .o.
              Plusum1  .o.      
              Plusum2;

define Plusum Plusumx .o.
              Plusumfr;

define Cleanup1 "^" -> 0;
define Cleanup2 ["+um"|"-a"|"-is"|"-us"|"-on"|"-s"|"-um"|"+ge"|"+prefix"]* -> 0;

define Cleanup Cleanup1 .o.
               Cleanup2;



define Grammar Lexicon           .o. 
               DelAdd            .o.
               Plusum            .o.
               Cleanup;

 define Unknown [UPCase LOWCase* [
                            ["+NN" "+Sg"]:["^" 0]|
                            ["+NN" "+Plural"]:["^" e n]|
                            ["+NN" "+Sg" "+Gen"]:["^" e n]
                                ]|
                             [0:[g e "^"] LOWCase* "+V" "+PastP"]:["^" t]|
                             [LOWCase* "+V" "+Infinit"]:["^" e n]] ;

define BRule {ss} -> ß ;

define BGrammar Grammar .o.
                BRule;

define Guesser Unknown   .o.
               Cleanup;

#regex Grammar .p. Guesser;
#regex Grammar .p. BGrammar;
regex [RC+ "-"]^{0,3} Grammar .p. Voc Grammar .p. BGrammar .p. Guesser;
